Hawaii statutes.
§461-14 Permits for operation of pharmacy.
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to operate, maintain, open, change
location, or establish any pharmacy within the State without first having
obtained a permit from the board.

(b) Application for permits shall be made on a
form to be prescribed by the board. Separate application shall be made and
separate permits issued for each separate place at which is carried on any of
the operations for which a permit is required.

(c) On evidence satisfactory to the board, a
permit shall be issued, provided:

(1) That the pharmacy for which the permit is sought
is or will be, in full compliance with this chapter and rules of the board;

(2) That the location and appointments of the
pharmacy are such that it can be operated and maintained without endangering
the public health or safety; and

(3) That the pharmacy will be under the personal and
immediate supervision of a registered pharmacist.

(d) No application for a permit shall be
refused except pursuant to this section and only after notice to the applicant
and a full and fair hearing. [L 1949, c 175, pt of §1; RL 1955, §71-14; HRS
§461-14; am L 1983, c 23, §5; am L 1986, c 143, §13; am L 2008, c 212, §§4, 7;
am L 2009, c 11, §20 and c 96, §3; am L 2013, c 184, §2; am L 2014, c 9, §10]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next